Washington statutes.
RCW 42.16.015

Cancellation of warrants—Transfer of increased balance amounts in state payroll revolving account.

All amounts increasing the balance in the state payroll revolving account, as a result of the cancellation of warrants issued therefrom shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the fund from which the canceled warrant would originally have been paid except for the provisions of RCW 42.16.010 through 42.16.017.

[ 1981 c 9 s 5; 1967 ex.s. c 25 s 6.]